California statutes. Commercial Code
(4) If the auctioneer knowingly receives a bid on the seller’s behalf or the seller makes or procures such a bid, and notice has not been given that liberty for such bidding is reserved, the buyer may at his option avoid the sale or take the goods at the price of the last good faith bid prior to the completion of the sale. This subdivision shall not apply to any bid at a forced sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Title, Creditors and Good Faith Purchasers [2401. - 2403.]

2401.

Each provision of this division with regard to the rights, obligations and remedies of the seller, the buyer, purchasers or other third parties applies irrespective of title to the goods except where the provision refers to such title. Insofar as situations are not covered by the other provisions of this division and matters concerning title become material the following rules apply:

(1) Title to goods cannot pass under a contract for sale prior to their identification to the contract (Section 2501), and unless otherwise explicitly agreed the buyer acquires by their identification a special property as limited by this code. Any retention or reservation by the seller of the title (property) in goods shipped or delivered to the buyer is limited in effect to a reservation of a security interest. Subject to these provisions and to the provisions of
 the division on secured transactions (Division 9), title to goods passes from the seller to the buyer in any manner and on any conditions explicitly agreed on by the parties.

(2) Unless otherwise explicitly agreed title passes to the buyer at the time and place at which the seller completes his performance with reference to the physical delivery of the goods, despite any reservation of a security interest and even though a document of title is to be delivered at a different time or place; and in particular and despite any reservation of a security interest by the bill of lading

(a) If the contract requires or authorizes the seller to send the goods to the buyer but does not require him to deliver them at destination, title passes to the buyer at the time and place of shipment; but

(b) If the contract requires delivery at destination, title passes on tender there.

(3) Unless otherwise explicitly
 agreed where delivery is to be made without moving the goods,

(a) If the seller is to deliver a tangible document of title, title passes at the time when and the place where he delivers such documents and if the seller is to deliver an electronic document of title, title passes when the seller delivers the document; or

(b) If the goods are at the time of contracting already identified and no documents of title are to be delivered, title passes at the time and place of contracting.

(4) A rejection or other refusal by the buyer to receive or retain the goods, whether or not justified, or a justified revocation of acceptance revests title to the goods in the seller. Such revesting occurs by operation of law and is not a “sale.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2402.

(1) Except as provided in subdivisions (2) and (3), rights of unsecured creditors of the seller with respect to goods which have been identified to a contract for sale are subject to the buyer’s rights to recover the goods under this division (Sections 2502 and 2716).

(2) A creditor of the seller may treat a sale or an identification of goods to a contract for sale as void if as against him or her a retention of possession by the seller is fraudulent or void under any rule of law of the state where the goods are situated, except that retention of possession in good faith and current course of trade by a merchant-seller for a commercially reasonable time after a sale or identification is not fraudulent or void.

(3) Nothing in this division shall be deemed to impair the rights of creditors of the seller:

(a) Under the provisions of the division on secured transactions (Division 9);
 or

(b) Where identification to the contract or delivery is made not in current course of trade but in satisfaction of or as security for a pre-existing claim for money, security or the like and is made under circumstances which under any rule of law of the state where the goods are situated would apart from this division constitute the transaction a fraudulent transfer or voidable preference.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1368, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 1368.)
-------------------------------------------

2403.

(1) A purchaser of goods acquires all title which his transferor had or had power to transfer except that a purchaser of a limited interest acquires rights only to the extent of the interest purchased. A person with voidable title has power to transfer a good title to a good faith purchaser for value. When goods have been delivered under a transaction of purchase the purchaser has such power even though

(a) The transferor was deceived as to the identity of the purchaser, or

(b) The delivery was in exchange for a check which is later dishonored, or

(c) It was agreed that the transaction was to be a “cash sale,” or

(d) The delivery was procured through fraud punishable as larcenous under the criminal law.

(2) Any entrusting of possession of goods to a merchant who deals in goods of that kind gives him power to transfer all rights
 of the entruster to a buyer in ordinary course of business.

(3) “Entrusting” includes any delivery and any acquiescence in retention of possession for the purpose of sale, obtaining offers to purchase, locating a buyer, or the like; regardless of any condition expressed between the parties to the delivery or acquiescence and regardless of whether the procurement of the entrusting or the possessor’s disposition of the goods have been such as to be larcenous under the criminal law.

(4) The rights of other purchasers of goods and of lien creditors are governed by the divisions on secured transactions (Division 9), bulk transfers (Division 6) and documents of title (Division 7).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 799.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Performance [2501. - 2515.]

2501.

(1) The buyer obtains a special property and an insurable interest in goods by identification of existing goods as goods to which the contract refers even though the goods so identified are nonconforming and he has an option to return or reject them. Such identification can be made at any time and in any manner explicitly agreed to by the parties. In the absence of explicit agreement identification occurs

(a) When the contract is made if it is for the sale of goods already existing and identified;

(b) If the contract is for the
 sale of future goods other than those described in paragraph (c), when goods are shipped, marked or otherwise designated by the seller as goods to which the contract refers;

(c) If the contract is for the sale of unborn young or future crops, when the crops are planted or otherwise become growing crops or the young are conceived.

(2) The seller retains an insurable interest in goods so long as title to or any security interest in the goods remains in him and where the identification is by the seller alone he may until default or insolvency or notification to the buyer that the identification is final substitute other goods for those identified.

(3) Nothing in this section impairs any insurable interest recognized under any other statute or rule of law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2502.

(1) Subject to subdivisions (2) and (3), and even though the goods have not been shipped, a buyer who has paid a part or all of the price of goods in which he or she has a special property under the provisions of the immediately preceding section may on making and keeping good a tender of any unpaid portion of their price recover them from the seller if either:

(a) In the case of
 goods bought for personal, family, or household purposes, the seller repudiates or fails to deliver as required by the contract.

(b) In all cases, the seller becomes insolvent within 10 days after receipt of the first installment on their price.

(2) The buyer’s right to recover the goods under paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) vests upon acquisition of a special property, even if the seller had not then repudiated or failed to deliver.

(3) If the identification creating his or her special property has been made by the buyer, he or she acquires the right to recover the goods only if they conform to the contract for sale.

(History: Amended (as to be amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 1003.)
-------------------------------------------

2503.

(1) Tender of delivery requires that the seller put and hold conforming goods at the buyer’s disposition and give the buyer any notification reasonably necessary to enable him to take delivery. The manner, time and place for tender are determined by the agreement and this division, and in particular

(a) Tender must be at a reasonable hour, and if it is of goods they must be kept available for the period reasonably necessary to enable the buyer to take possession; but

(b) Unless otherwise agreed, the buyer must furnish facilities reasonably suited to the receipt of the goods.

(2) Where the case is within the next section respecting shipment tender requires that the seller comply with its provisions.

(3) Where the seller is required to deliver at a particular destination tender requires that he comply with subdivision (1) and also in any appropriate case tender documents as described in subdivisions (4) and (5) of this section.

(4) Where goods are in the possession of a bailee and are to be delivered without being moved

(a) Tender requires that the seller either tender a negotiable document of title covering such goods or procure acknowledgment by the
 bailee of the buyer’s right to possession of the goods; but

(b) Tender to the buyer of a nonnegotiable document of title or of a record directing the bailee to deliver is sufficient tender unless the buyer seasonably objects, and except as otherwise provided in Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101), receipt by the bailee of notification of the buyer’s rights fixes those rights as against the bailee and all third persons; but risk of loss of the goods and of any failure by the bailee to honor the nonnegotiable document of title or to obey the direction remains on the seller until the buyer has had a reasonable time to present the document or direction, and a refusal by the bailee to honor the document or to obey the direction defeats the tender.

(5) Where the contract requires the seller to deliver documents

(a) He must tender all such documents in correct form, except as provided in this division with respect to bills of lading in a set (subdivision (2) of Section 2323); and

(b) Tender through customary banking channels is sufficient and dishonor of a draft accompanying or associated with the documents constitutes nonacceptance or rejection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2504.

Where the seller is required or authorized to send the goods to the buyer and the contract does not require him to deliver them at a particular destination, then unless otherwise agreed he must(a) Put the goods in the possession of such a carrier and make such a contract for their transportation as may be reasonable having regard to the nature of the goods and other circumstances of the case; and(b) Obtain and promptly deliver or tender in due form any document
 necessary to enable the buyer to obtain possession of the goods or otherwise required by the agreement or by usage of trade; and(c) Promptly notify the buyer of the shipment.Failure to notify the buyer under paragraph (c) or to make a proper contract under paragraph (a) is a ground for rejection only if material delay or loss ensues.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2505.

(1) Where the seller has identified goods to the contract by or before shipment:

(a) His procurement of a negotiable bill of lading to his own order or otherwise reserves in him a security interest in the goods. His procurement of the bill to the order of a financing agency or of the buyer indicates in addition only the seller’s expectation of transferring that interest to the person named.

(b) A nonnegotiable bill
 of lading to himself or his nominee reserves possession of the goods as security but except in a case of conditional delivery (subdivision (2) of Section 2507) a nonnegotiable bill of lading naming the buyer as consignee reserves no security interest even though the seller retains possession or control of the bill of lading.

(2) When shipment by the seller with reservation of a security interest is in violation of the contract for sale it constitutes an improper contract for transportation within the preceding section but impairs neither the rights given to the buyer by shipment and identification of the goods to the contract nor the seller’s powers as a holder of a negotiable document of title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2506.

(1) A financing agency by paying or purchasing for value a draft which relates to a shipment of goods acquires to the extent of the payment or purchase and in addition to its own rights under the draft and any document of title securing it any rights of the shipper in the goods including the right to stop delivery and the shipper’s right to have the draft honored by the buyer.

(2) The right to reimbursement of a financing agency which has in good faith honored or purchased the
 draft under commitment to or authority from the buyer is not impaired by subsequent discovery of defects with reference to any relevant document which was apparently regular.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2507.

(1) Tender of delivery is a condition to the buyer’s duty to accept the goods and, unless otherwise agreed, to his duty to pay for them. Tender entitles the seller to acceptance of the goods and to payment according to the contract.

(2) Where payment is due and demanded on the delivery to the buyer of goods or documents of title, his right as against the seller to retain or dispose of them is conditional upon his making the payment due.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2508.

(1) Where any tender or delivery by the seller is rejected because nonconforming and the time for performance has not yet expired, the seller may seasonably notify the buyer of his intention to cure and may then within the contract time make a conforming delivery.

(2) Where the buyer rejects a nonconforming tender which the seller had reasonable grounds to believe would be acceptable with or without money allowance the seller may if he seasonally notifies the buyer have a further reasonable time to substitute a conforming tender.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2509.

(1) Where the contract requires or authorizes the seller to ship the goods by carrier

(a) If it does not require him to deliver them at a particular destination, the risk of loss passes to the buyer when the goods are duly delivered to the carrier even though the shipment is under reservation (Section 2505); but

(b) If it does require him to deliver them at a particular destination and the goods are there duly
 tendered while in the possession of the carrier, the risk of loss passes to the buyer when the goods are there duly so tendered as to enable the buyer to take delivery.

(2) Where the goods are held by a bailee to be delivered without being moved, the risk of loss passes to the buyer

(a) On his receipt of possession or control of a negotiable document of title covering the goods; or

(b) On acknowledgment by the bailee of the buyer’s right to possession of the goods; or

(c) After his receipt of possession or control of a nonnegotiable document of title or other direction to deliver in a record, as provided in subdivision (4)(b) of Section 2503.

(3) In any case not within subdivision (1) or
 (2), the risk of loss passes to the buyer on his receipt of the goods if the seller is a merchant; otherwise the risk passes to the buyer on tender of delivery.

(4) The provisions of this section are subject to contrary agreement of the parties and to the provisions of this division on sale on approval (Section 2327) and on effect of breach on risk of loss (Section 2510).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2510.

(1) Where a tender or delivery of goods so fails to conform to the contract as to give a right of rejection the risk of their loss remains on the seller until cure or acceptance.

(2) Where the buyer rightfully revokes acceptance he may to the extent of any deficiency in his effective insurance coverage treat the risk of loss as having rested on the seller from the beginning.

(3) Where the buyer as to conforming goods already identified to the contract for sale repudiates or is otherwise in breach before risk of their loss has
 passed to him, the seller may to the extent of any deficiency in his effective insurance coverage treat the risk of loss as resting on the buyer for a commercially reasonable time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2511.

(1) Unless otherwise agreed, tender of payment is a condition to the seller’s duty to tender and complete any delivery.

(2) Tender of payment is sufficient when made by any means or in any manner current in the ordinary course of business unless the seller demands payment in legal tender and gives any extension of time reasonably necessary to procure it.

(3) Subject to the provisions of this code on the effect of an
 instrument on an obligation (Section 3310), payment by check is conditional and is defeated as between the parties by dishonor of the check on due presentment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2512.

(1) Where the contract requires payment before inspection nonconformity of the goods does not excuse the buyer from so making payment unless (a) the nonconformity appears without inspection or (b) despite tender of the required documents the circumstances would justify injunction against honor under this code (subdivision (b) of Section 5109).

(2) Payment pursuant to subdivision (1) does not constitute an acceptance of goods or impair the buyer’s right to inspect or any of his
 remedies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 176, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2513.

(1) Unless otherwise agreed and subject to subdivision (3), where goods are tendered or delivered or identified to the contract for sale, the buyer has a right before payment or acceptance to inspect them at any reasonable place and time and in any reasonable manner. When the seller is required or authorized to send the goods to the buyer, the inspection may be after their arrival.

(2) Expenses of inspection must be borne by the buyer but may be recovered from the seller if the goods do not conform and are rejected.

(3) Unless
 otherwise agreed and subject to the provisions of this division on C.I.F. contracts (subdivision (3) of Section 2321), the buyer is not entitled to inspect the goods before payment of the price when the contract provides

(a) For delivery “C.O.D.” or on other like terms; or

(b) For payment against documents of title, except where such payment is due only after the goods are to become available for inspection.

(4) A place or method of inspection fixed by the parties is presumed to be exclusive but unless otherwise expressly agreed it does not postpone identification or shift the place for delivery or for passing the risk of loss. If compliance becomes impossible, inspection shall be as provided in this section unless the place or method fixed was clearly intended as an indispensable condition failure of which avoids
 the contract.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2514.

Unless otherwise agreed documents against which a draft is drawn are to be delivered to the drawee on acceptance of the draft if it is payable more than three days after presentment; otherwise, only on payment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2515.

In furtherance of the adjustment of any claim or dispute

(a) Either party on reasonable notification to the other and for the purpose of ascertaining the facts and preserving evidence has the right to inspect, test and sample the goods including such of them as may be in the possession or control of the other; and

(b) The parties may agree to a third party inspection or survey to determine the conformity or condition of the goods and may agree that the findings shall be binding upon them in any subsequent litigation or adjustment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Breach, Repudiation and Excuse [2601. - 2616.]

2601.

Subject to the provisions of this division on breach in installment contracts (Section 2612) and unless otherwise agreed under the sections on contractual limitations of remedy (Sections 2718 and 2719), if the goods or the tender of delivery fail in any respect to conform to the contract, the buyer may

(a) Reject the whole; or

(b) Accept the whole; or

(c) Accept any commercial unit or units and reject the rest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2602.

(1) Rejection of goods must be within a reasonable time after their delivery or tender. It is ineffective unless the buyer seasonably notifies the seller.

(2) Subject to the provisions of the two following sections on rejected goods (Sections 2603 and 2604),

(a) After rejection any exercise of ownership by the buyer with respect to any commercial unit is wrongful as against the seller; and

(b) If the buyer has before rejection taken physical possession of goods in which he does not have a security
 interest under the provisions of this division (subdivision (3) of Section 2711), he is under a duty after rejection to hold them with reasonable care at the seller’s disposition for a time sufficient to permit the seller to remove them; but

(c) The buyer has no further obligations with regard to goods rightfully rejected.

(3) The seller’s rights with respect to goods wrongfully rejected are governed by the provisions of this division on seller’s remedies in general (Section 2703).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2603.

(1) Subject to any security interest in the buyer (subdivision (3) of Section 2711), when the seller has no agent or place of business at the market of rejection a merchant buyer is under a duty after rejection of goods in his possession or control to follow any reasonable instructions received from the seller with respect to the goods and in the absence of such instructions to make reasonable efforts to sell them for the seller’s account if they are perishable or threaten to decline in value speedily. Instructions are not reasonable if on demand indemnity for expenses is not forthcoming.

(2) When the buyer sells goods under
 subdivision (1), he is entitled to reimbursement from the seller or out of the proceeds for reasonable expenses of caring for and selling them, and if the expenses include no selling commission then to such commission as is usual in the trade or if there is none to a reasonable sum not exceeding 10 percent on the gross proceeds.

(3) In complying with this section the buyer is held only to good faith and good faith conduct hereunder is neither acceptance nor conversion nor the basis of an action for damages.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2604.

Subject to the provisions of the immediately preceding section on perishables if the seller gives no instructions within a reasonable time after notification of rejection the buyer may store the rejected goods for the seller’s account or reship them to him or resell them for the seller’s account with reimbursement as provided in the preceding section. Such action is not acceptance or conversion.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2605.

(1) The buyer’s failure to state in connection with rejection a particular defect which is ascertainable by reasonable inspection precludes him from relying on the unstated defect to justify rejection or to establish breach

(a) Where the seller could have cured it if stated seasonably; or

(b) Between merchants when the seller has after rejection made a request in writing for a full and final written statement of all defects on which the buyer proposes to
 rely.

(2) Payment against documents made without reservation of rights precludes recovery of the payment for defects apparent in the documents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2606.

(1) Acceptance of goods occurs when the buyer

(a) After a reasonable opportunity to inspect the goods signifies to the seller that the goods are conforming or that he will take or retain them in spite of their nonconformity; or

(b) Fails to make an effective rejection (subdivision (1) of Section 2602), but such acceptance does not occur until the buyer has had a reasonable opportunity to inspect them; or

(c) Does any act inconsistent with the seller’s ownership; but if such act is wrongful as against the
 seller it is an acceptance only if ratified by him.

(2) Acceptance of a part of any commercial unit is acceptance of that entire unit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2607.

(1) The buyer must pay at the contract rate for any goods accepted.

(2) Acceptance of goods by the buyer precludes rejection of the goods accepted and, if made with knowledge of a nonconformity, cannot be revoked because of it unless the acceptance was on the reasonable assumption that the nonconformity would be seasonably cured. Acceptance does not of itself impair any other remedy provided by this division for nonconformity.

(3) Where a tender has been
 accepted:

(A) The buyer must, within a reasonable time after he or she discovers or should have discovered any breach, notify the seller of breach or be barred from any remedy; and

(B) If the claim is one for infringement or the like (subdivision (3) of Section 2312) and the buyer is sued as a result of such a breach, the buyer must so notify the seller within a reasonable time after he or she receives notice of the litigation or be barred from any remedy over for liability established by the litigation.

(4) The burden is on the buyer to establish any breach with respect to the goods accepted.

(5) Where the buyer is sued for breach of a warranty or other obligation for which his or her seller is answerable over:

(A) He or she may give the seller written notice of the litigation. If the notice states that the seller may defend and that if the seller does not do so he or she will be bound in any action against the seller by the buyer by any determination of fact common to the two litigation actions, then unless the seller after seasonable receipt of the notice does defend he or she is so bound.

(B) If the claim is one for infringement or the like (subdivision (3) of Section 2312) the original seller may demand in writing that the buyer turn over to the seller control of the litigation, including settlement, or else be barred from any remedy over and if the seller also agrees to bear all expense and to satisfy any adverse judgment, then unless the buyer after seasonable receipt of the demand does turn over control the buyer is so barred.

(6) The provisions of subdivisions (3), (4) and (5) apply to any obligation of a buyer to hold the seller harmless against infringement or the like (subdivision (3) of Section 2312).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2608.

(1) The buyer may revoke his acceptance of a lot or commercial unit whose nonconformity substantially impairs its value to him if he has accepted it

(a) On the reasonable assumption that its nonconformity would be cured and it has not been seasonably cured; or

(b) Without discovery of such nonconformity if his acceptance was reasonably induced either by the difficulty of discovery before acceptance or by the seller’s assurances.

(2) Revocation of acceptance must occur within a reasonable time after the
 buyer discovers or should have discovered the ground for it and before any substantial change in condition of the goods which is not caused by their own defects. It is not effective until the buyer notifies the seller of it.

(3) A buyer who so revokes has the same rights and duties with regard to the goods involved as if he had rejected them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2609.

(1) A contract for sale imposes an obligation on each party that the other’s expectation of receiving due performance will not be impaired. When reasonable grounds for insecurity arise with respect to the performance of either party the other may in writing demand adequate assurance of due performance and until he receives such assurance may if commercially reasonable suspend any performance for which he has not already received the agreed return.

(2) Between merchants the reasonableness of grounds for insecurity and the adequacy of any assurance offered shall be determined according to commercial standards.

(3) Acceptance of any improper delivery or payment does not prejudice the aggrieved party’s right to demand adequate assurance of future performance.

(4) After receipt of a justified demand failure to provide within a reasonable time not exceeding 30 days such assurance of due performance as is adequate under the circumstances of the particular case is a repudiation of the contract.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2610.

When either party repudiates the contract with respect to a performance not yet due the loss of which will substantially impair the value of the contract to the other, the aggrieved party may

(a) For a commercially reasonable time await performance by the repudiating party; or

(b) Resort to any rememdy for breach (Section 2703 or Section 2711), even though he has notified the repudiating party that he would await the latter’s performance and has urged retraction; and

(c) In either case suspend his own performance or proceed
 in accordance with the provisions of this division on the seller’s right to identify goods to the contract notwithstanding breach or to salvage unfinished goods (Section 2704).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2611.

(1) Until the repudiating party’s next performance is due he can retract his repudiation unless the aggrieved party has since the repudiation canceled or materially changed his position or otherwise indicated that he considers the repudiation final.

(2) Retraction may be by any method which clearly indicates to the aggrieved party that the repudiating party intends to perform, but must include any assurance justifiably demanded under the provisions of this division (Section 2609).

(3) Retraction reinstates the repudiating party’s rights under the contract with due
 excuse and allowance to the aggrieved party for any delay occasioned by the repudiation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2612.

(1) An “installment contract” is one which requires or authorizes the delivery of goods in separate lots to be separately accepted, even though the contract contains a clause “each delivery is a separate contract” or its equivalent.

(2) The buyer may reject any installment which is nonconforming if the nonconformity substantially impairs the value of that installment and cannot be cured or if the nonconformity is a defect in the required documents; but if the nonconformity does not fall within subdivision (3) and the seller gives adequate assurance of its cure the buyer must accept that installment.

(3) Whenever nonconformity or default with respect to one or more installments substantially impairs the value of the whole contract there is a breach of the whole. But the aggrieved party reinstates the contract if he accepts a nonconforming installment without seasonably notifying of cancellation or if he brings an action with respect only to past installments or demands performance as to future installments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2613.

Where the contract requires for its performance goods identified when the contract is made, and the goods suffer casualty without fault of either party before the risk of loss passes to the buyer, or in a proper case under a “no arrival, no sale” term (Section 2324) then

(a) If the loss is total the contract is avoided; and

(b) If the loss is partial or the goods have so deteriorated as no longer to conform to the contract the buyer may nevertheless demand inspection and at his option either treat the contract as avoided or accept the goods with due allowance from the contract price for
 the deterioration or the deficiency in quantity but without further right against the seller.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2614.

(1) Where without fault of either party the agreed berthing, loading, or unloading facilities fail or an agreed type of carrier becomes unavailable or the agreed manner of delivery otherwise becomes commercially impracticable but a commercially reasonable substitute is available, such substitute performance must be tendered and accepted.

(2) If the agreed means or manner of payment fails because of domestic or foreign governmental regulation, the seller may withhold or stop delivery unless the buyer provides a means or manner of payment which is commercially a substantial equivalent. If delivery has already been taken, payment by
 the means or in the manner provided by the regulation discharges the buyer’s obligation unless the regulation is discriminatory, oppressive or predatory.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2615.

Except so far as a seller may have assumed a greater obligation and subject to the preceding section on substituted performance:

(a) Delay in delivery or nondelivery in whole or in part by a seller who complies with paragraphs (b) and (c) is not a breach of his duty under a contract for sale if performance as agreed has been made impracticable by the occurrence of a contingency the nonoccurrence of which was a basic assumption on which the contract was made or by compliance in good faith with any applicable foreign or domestic governmental regulation or order whether or not it later proves to be invalid.

(b) Where the causes mentioned in paragraph (a) affect only a part of the seller’s capacity to perform, he must allocate production and deliveries among his customers but may at his option include regular customers not then under contract as well as his own requirements for further manufacture. He may so allocate in any manner which is fair and reasonable.

(c) The seller must notify the buyer seasonably that there will be delay or nondelivery and, when allocation is required under paragraph (b), of the estimated quota thus made available for the buyer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2616.

(1) Where the buyer receives notification of a material or indefinite delay or an allocation justified under the preceding section he may by written notification to the seller as to any delivery concerned, and where the prospective deficiency substantially impairs the value of the whole contract under the provisions of this division relating to breach of installment contracts (Section 2612), then also as to the whole,

(a) Terminate and thereby discharge any unexecuted portion of the contract; or 

(b) Modify the contract by agreeing to take his available quota in
 substitution.

(2) If after receipt of such notification from the seller the buyer fails so to modify the contract within a reasonable time not exceeding 30 days the contract lapses with respect to any deliveries affected.

(3) The provisions of this section may not be negated by agreement except insofar as the seller has assumed a greater obligation under the preceding section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Remedies [2701. - 2725.]

2701.

Remedies for breach of any obligation or promise collateral or ancillary to a contract for sale are not impaired by the provisions of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2702.

(1) Where the seller discovers the buyer to be insolvent he may refuse delivery except for cash including payment for all goods theretofore delivered under the contract, and stop delivery under this division (Section 2705).

(2) Where the seller discovers that the buyer has received goods on credit while insolvent he may reclaim the goods upon demand made within 10 days after the receipt, but if misrepresentation of solvency has been made to the particular seller in writing within three months before delivery the 10-day limitation does not apply. Except as provided in this subdivision the seller may not base a right to reclaim goods on the buyer’s fraudulent or innocent misrepresentation of solvency or of intent to pay.

(3) The seller’s right to reclaim under subdivision (2) is subject to the rights of a buyer in ordinary course or other good faith purchaser under this division (Section 2403). Successful
 reclamation of goods excludes all other remedies with respect to them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2703.

Where the buyer wrongfully rejects or revokes acceptance of goods or fails to make a payment due on or before delivery or repudiates with respect to a part or the whole, then with respect to any goods directly affected and, if the breach is of the whole contract (Section 2612), then also with respect to the whole undelivered balance, the aggrieved seller may

(a) Withhold delivery of such goods;

(b) Stop delivery by any bailee as hereafter provided (Section 2705);

(c) Proceed under the next section respecting goods still unidentified to the contract;

(d) Resell and recover damages as hereafter provided (Section 2706);

(e) Recover damages for nonacceptance (Section 2708) or in a proper case the price (Section 2709);

(f) Cancel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2704.
